South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S190.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 31-12-30(6) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (6)(1) "Redevelopment project" means buildings, improvements, including street improvements, water, sewer and storm drainage facilities, parking facilities, and recreational facilities, and includes affordable housing projects where all or a part of new property tax revenues generated in the tax increment financing district is used to provide or support publicly and privately owned affordable housing in the district or is used to provide infrastructure projects to support publicly and privately owned affordable housing in the district. A project or undertaking authorized under Section 6-21-50 also may qualify as a redevelopment project under this chapter. All such projects may be owned by the authority, the municipality, the county, or other appropriate public body. This term includes portions of the redevelopment project located outside the redevelopment project area so long as they provide needed infrastructure support for the redevelopment project area or the municipality makes specific findings of benefit to the redevelopment area. (2) As used in this section, "affordable housing" means residential housing for rent or sale that is appropriately priced for rent or sale to a person or family whose income does not exceed eighty percent of the median income for the local area, with adjustment for household size, according to the latest figures available from the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD). SECTION 2.  Section 31-12-210(F) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (F) The obligations must be issued not later than fifteen  thirty-five years after the adoption of an ordinance by the municipality pursuant to Section 31-12-280 concurring in an authority's redevelopment plan. SECTION 3.  Section 12-10-88(E) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (E) For purposes of this section "closed or realigned federal installation" means that: (1) until January 1, 2028 June 30, 2044, a federal defense site in which permanent employment was reduced by three thousand or more jobs from the level of such jobs on December 31, 1990, or a federal military base or installation which has been closed or realigned under: (a)(1) the Defense Base Closure and Realignment Act of 1990; (b)(2) Title 11 of the Defense Authorization Amendments and Base Closure and Realignment Act;  or (c)(3) Section 2687 of Title 10, United States Code. SECTION 4.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----